New York, session 2025-2026, S3261.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 495 of the tax law, as added by 2 chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 (a) Every person on whom tax is imposed under this article shall, on 4 or before the twentieth day of the month following each quarterly period 5 ending on the last day of February, May, August, and November, respec- 6 tively, file electronically with the commissioner a return on forms to 7 be prescribed by the commissioner, showing the total amount of tax due 8 in such quarterly period, and including such other information as the 9 commissioner may require; provided, however, that a distributor for whom 10 tax is imposed pursuant to this article may elect to file electronically 11 with the commissioner for an annual period instead of a quarterly peri- 12 od. If a distributor elects to file electronically for an annual peri- 13 od, the distributor shall file electronically before the twentieth day 14 of the month following each year ending on the last day of December in a 15 manner prescribed by the commissioner. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01105-01-5